Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1708
Employee or payee, defined.

Employee or payee shall mean any person who is compensated by or receives income from an employer or other payor, regardless of how such income is denominated.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 28;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 21;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 12.